Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF86.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144E.275, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Community emergency medical technician. (a) To be eligible for certification by the director as a CEMT, an individual shall: (1) be currently certified as an EMT or AEMT; (2) have two years of service as an EMT or AEMT; deleted text begin (3) be a member of: deleted text end deleted text begin (i) a registered medical response unit as defined under this section; or deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) a basic life support ambulance service that meets the requirements of section 144E.101, subdivision 6; deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end successfully complete a CEMT education programnew text begin that: (i) isnew text end from a college deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end university deleted text begin thatdeleted text end new text begin , or health care system providing CEMT care; and (ii)new text end has been approved by the director or accredited by a director-approved national accrediting organization. The education must include clinical experience under the supervision of the deleted text begin medical response unit or ambulance servicedeleted text end new text begin physiciannew text end medical directornew text begin of the program through which the CEMT is providing servicesnew text end , an advanced practice registered nurse, a physician assistant, or a public health nurse operating under the direct authority of a local unit of government; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end successfully complete an education program that includes education in providing culturally appropriate care; and deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end complete a director-approved application form. (b) A CEMT must practice in accordance with protocols and supervisory standards established by the deleted text begin medical response unit or ambulance servicedeleted text end new text begin program's physiciannew text end medical director in accordance with section 144E.265. (c) A CEMT may provide services within the CEMT skill set as approved by the medical response unit or ambulance service medical director. (d) A CEMT may provide deleted text begin episodicdeleted text end individual patientnew text begin care,new text end educationnew text begin ,new text end and prevention education deleted text begin but onlydeleted text end as directed by a patient care plan developed by the patient's primary physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or a physician assistant, in conjunction with the deleted text begin medical response unit or ambulance servicedeleted text end new text begin program's physiciannew text end medical director and relevant local health care providers. The patient care plan must ensure that the services provided by the CEMT are consistent with services offered by the patient's health care home, if one exists, that the patient receives the necessary services, and that there is no duplication of services to the patient.new text begin CEMT services include health assessments, chronic disease monitoring and education, vaccinations, laboratory specimen collection, and hospital discharge follow-up care approved by the program's physician medical director.new text end (e) new text begin Services provided by a CEMT to a patient who is also receiving care coordination services must be provided in consultation with the providers of the patient's care coordination services.new text end new text begin (f) new text end A CEMT is subject to all certification, disciplinary, complaint, and other regulatory requirements that apply to EMTs under this chapter.new text begin In addition to the renewal requirements in section 144E.28, subdivision 7, a CEMT must complete an additional 12 hours of continuing education in clinical topics approved by the program's physician medical director.new text end deleted text begin (f) A CEMT may not provide services as defined in section 144A.471, subdivisions 6 and 7, except a CEMT may provide verbal or visual reminders to the patient to: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) take a regularly scheduled medication, but not to provide or bring the patient medication; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2) follow regularly scheduled treatment or exercise plans. deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, subdivision 60a, is amended to read: Subd. 60a. Community emergency medical technician services. (a) Medical assistance covers services provided by a community emergency medical technician (CEMT) who is certified under section 144E.275, subdivision 7, when the services are provided in accordance with this subdivision. (b) A CEMT may provide a postdischarge visit, after discharge from a hospital or skilled nursing facility, when ordered by a treating physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant. The postdischarge visit includes: (1) verbal or visual reminders of discharge orders; (2) recording and reporting of vital signs to the patient's primary care provider; (3) medication access confirmation; (4) food access confirmation; and (5) identification of home hazards. (c) An individual who has repeat ambulance calls due to falls or has been identified by the individual's primary care provider as at risk for nursing home placement, may receive a safety evaluation visit from a CEMT when ordered by a primary care provider in accordance with the individual's care plan. A safety evaluation visit includes: (1) medication access confirmation; (2) food access confirmation; and (3) identification of home hazards. (d) A CEMT shall be paid at deleted text begin $9.75deleted text end new text begin $100 per hour, billed at $25new text end per 15-minute incrementnew text begin and $1.25 per mile for mileage traveled to the individuals home onlynew text end . A safety evaluation visit may not be billed for the same day as a postdischarge visit for the same individual. new text begin (e) In order to be paid under this subdivision, a CEMT must hold a Unique Minnesota Provider Identifier (UMPI) number issued by the commissioner. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end